Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Cross references. —

As to requirement that courts shall be open to all, see art. 1, § 8, Wyo. Const.

As to judicial department generally, see art. 5, §§ 1 through 29, Wyo. Const.

For Code of Civil Procedure, see title 1.

As to elected public officials being exempt from jury duty, see §

1-11-103

.

For Uniform Judicial Notice of Foreign Law Act, see §§

1-12-301

through

1-12-306

.

As to court officers not being allowed witness fees, see §

1-14-112

.

As to duty of court to issue writ of habeas corpus without application in certain instances, see §

1-27-109

.

For Code of Criminal Procedure, see title 7.

As to probate court, see chapter 2 of title 2.

As to common laws, statutes and rules of construction, see chapter 1 of title 8.

As to juvenile court, see §

14-6-201

et seq.

As to county court houses and jails, see chapter 6 of title 18.

As to military courts and their jurisdiction, see §

19-12-101

et seq.

As to judges, court commissioners, magistrates and ordained ministers of the gospel solemnizing marriage, see §

20-1-106

.

As to nomination by primary for nonpartisan judicial offices, see §§

22-5-203

and

22-5-205

.

As to filling vacancies in nominations for offices, see §§

22-5-401

and

22-5-402

.

As to notary publics see title 32.

As to attorneys-at-law generally, see §§

33-5-101

through

33-5-117

.

As to acknowledgment of conveyances by judges or clerks of court, see §

34-1-113

.

As to judicial review of decisions of department of health, see §

35-1-221

.

As to appeals from the decisions of the board of land commissioners, see §§

36-2-201

through

36-2-210

.

As to defrauding drug and alcohol screening tests, see §

6-3-614

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts § 1 et seq.; 46 Am. Jur. 2d Judges § 1 et seq.

Relationship of judge to one who is party in an official or representative capacity as disqualification, 10 ALR2d 1307.

Power of successor judge taking office during term time to vacate, etc., judgment entered by his predecessor, 11 ALR2d 1117.

Jurisdiction of action at law for damages for tort concerning real property in another state, 30 ALR2d 1219.

Mandamus as remedy to compel assertedly disqualified judge to recuse self or to certify his disqualification, 45 ALR2d 937, 56 ALR Fed 494.

Power of court, in exercise of discretion, to refuse to entertain action for nonstatutory tort occurring in another state or country, 48 ALR2d 800.

Relationship to attorney as disqualifying judge, 50 ALR2d 143.

Disqualification of judge in proceedings to punish contempt directed against himself or a court of which he was a member, 64 ALR2d 600, 37 ALR4th 1004, 3 ALR Fed 420.

Disqualification of judge because of prior representation or activity as attorney or counsel, 72 ALR2d 443, 16 ALR4th 550.

Waiver of disqualification of judge, 73 ALR2d 1238.

Time for asserting disqualification of judge, 73 ALR2d 1238.

Substitution of judge in criminal case, 83 ALR2d 1032.

Intervenor's right to disqualify judge, 92 ALR2d 1110.

Validity of proceedings of trial court as affected by place of holding session, 18 ALR3d 572.

Power of successor or substituted judge, in civil case, to render decision or enter judgment on testimony heard by predecessor, 22 ALR3d 922.

Disqualification of judge for bias against attorney for litigant, 23 ALR3d 1416.

Stockholding as disqualification of judge to sit in action or proceeding, 25 ALR3d 1331.

Power of court to remove or suspend judge, 53 ALR3d 882.

Disqualification of original trial judge to sit on retrial after reversal or mistrial, 60 ALR3d 176.

Binding effect upon state courts of opinions of United States supreme court supported by less than a majority of its members, 65 ALR3d 504.

Validity and construction of constitutional or statutory provision making legal knowledge or experience a condition of eligibility for judicial office, 71 ALR3d 498.

Constitutional restrictions on nonattorney acting as judge in criminal proceeding, 71 ALR3d 562.

Substitution of judge in state criminal trial, 45 ALR5th 591.

48A C.J.S. Judges §§ 15 to 20.